Florida, session 2026, HB859.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
17
18 Section 1. Section 1003.574, Florida Statutes, is amended
19 to read:
20 1003.574 Video cameras in public school classrooms; pilot
21 program.—Beginning with the 2021-2022 school year, the Video
22 Cameras in Public School Classrooms Pilot Program is created for
23 a period of 3 school years.
24 (1) As used in this section, the term:
25 (a) "Incident" means an event, a circumstance, an act, or
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb859-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 859 2026
26 an omission that results in the abuse or neglect of a student
27 by:
28 1. An employee of a public school or school district; or
29 2. Another student.
30 (b) "School district" means the Broward County Public
31 Schools.
32 (b)(c) "Self-contained classroom" means a classroom at a
33 public school in which a majority of the students in regular
34 attendance are provided special education services and are
35 assigned to one or more such classrooms for at least 50 percent
36 of the instructional day.
37 (2)(a) Each district school board shall establish a policy
38 to provide video cameras in self-contained classrooms upon the
39 request of a parent under paragraph (b).
40 (b)(a) A school district shall provide a video camera to
41 any school with a self-contained classroom upon the written
42 request of a parent of a student in the classroom.
43 (c)(b) Within 30 days after receipt of the request from a
44 parent, a video camera must shall be operational in each self-
45 contained classroom in which the parent's student is in regular
46 attendance for the remainder of the school year, unless the
47 parent withdraws his or her request in writing.
48 (3) If the student who is the subject of the initial
49 request is no longer in attendance in the classroom and a school
50 discontinues operation of a video camera during a school year,
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb859-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 859 2026
51 no later than the 5th school day before the date the operation
52 of the video camera is discontinued, the school must notify the
53 parents of each student in regular attendance in the classroom
54 that operation of the video camera will cease unless the
55 continued use of the camera is requested by a parent. No later
56 than the 10th school day before the end of each school year, the
57 school must notify the parents of each student in regular
58 attendance in the classroom that operation of the video camera
59 will not continue during the following school year unless a
60 written request is submitted by a parent for the next school
61 year.
62 (4)(a) A video camera placed in a self-contained classroom
63 must be capable of all of the following:
64 1. Monitoring all areas of the self-contained classroom,
65 including, without limitation, any room attached to the self-
66 contained classroom which is used for other purposes.
67 2. Recording audio from all areas of the self-contained
68 classroom, including, without limitation, any room attached to
69 the self-contained classroom which is used for other purposes.
70 (b) A video camera placed in a self-contained classroom
71 may not monitor a restroom or any other area in the self-
72 contained classroom where a student changes his or her clothes,
73 except for the entryway, exitway, or hallway outside a restroom
74 or other area where a student changes his or her clothes because
75 of the layout of the self-contained classroom.
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb859-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 859 2026
76 (c) A video camera placed in a self-contained classroom is
77 not required to be in operation when students are not present in
78 the self-contained classroom.
79 (d) If there is an interruption in the operation of the
80 video camera for any reason, an explanation must be submitted in
81 writing to the school principal and the district school board
82 which explains the reason for and duration of the interruption.
83 The written explanation must be maintained at the district
84 school board office for at least 1 year.
85 (5) Before a school initially places a video camera in a
86 self-contained classroom pursuant to this section, the school
87 shall provide written notice of the placement of such video
88 camera to all of the following:
89 (a) The parent of each student who is assigned to the
90 self-contained classroom.
91 (b) Each student who is assigned to the self-contained
92 classroom.
93 (c) The school district.
94 (d) Each school employee who is assigned to work with one
95 or more students in the self-contained classroom.
96 (6) A school shall:
97 (a) Retain video recorded from a video camera placed
98 pursuant to this section for at least 3 months after the date
99 the video was recorded, after which the recording must shall be
100 deleted or otherwise made irretrievable unretrievable; or
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb859-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 859 2026
101 (b) Retain the recording until the conclusion of any
102 investigation or any administrative or legal proceedings that
103 result from the recording have been completed, including,
104 without limitation, the exhaustion of all appeals.
105 (7) A school or school district may not:
106 (a) Allow regular, continuous, or continual monitoring of
107 video recorded under this section; or
108 (b) Use video recorded under this section for teacher
109 evaluations or any purpose other than for ensuring the health,
110 safety, and well-being of students receiving special education
111 services in a self-contained classroom; or
112 (c) Conceal the identity of a school or school district
113 employee who appears in a video recording.
114 (8) The principal of the school is the custodian of a
115 video camera operated pursuant to this section, all recordings
116 generated by that video camera, and access to such recordings.
117 (a) The release or viewing of any video recording under
118 this section must comply with s. 1002.22.
119 (b) A school or school district shall:
120 1. Conceal the identity of any student who appears in a
121 video recording, but is not involved in the alleged incident
122 documented by the video recording, which the school allows to be
123 viewed under subsection (9), including, without limitation,
124 blurring the face of the uninvolved student.
125 2. Protect the confidentiality of all student records
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb859-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 859 2026
126 contained in a video recording in accordance with s. 1002.22.
127 (9)(a) Within 7 days after receiving a request to view a
128 video recording, a school or school district shall allow the
129 following individuals to view a video recording with its
130 accompanying audio made under this section:
131 1. A school or school district employee who is involved in
132 an alleged incident that is documented by the video recording as
133 part of the investigative process;
134 2. A parent of a student who is involved in an alleged
135 incident that is documented by the video recording and has been
136 reported to the school or school district;
137 3. A school or school district employee as part of an
138 investigation into an alleged incident that is documented by the
139 video recording and has been reported to the school or school
140 district;
141 4. A law enforcement officer as part of an investigation
142 into an alleged incident that is documented by the video
143 recording and has been reported to the law enforcement agency;
144 or
145 5. The Department of Children and Families as part of a
146 child abuse or neglect investigation.
147 (b) A person who requests to view a recording must shall
148 make himself or herself available for viewing the recording
149 within 30 days after being notified by the school or school
150 district that the person's request has been granted.
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb859-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 859 2026
151 (c) A person who views the recording and suspects that
152 child abuse has occurred must report the suspected child abuse
153 to the Department of Children and Families.
154 (10)(a) Any individual may appeal to the State Board of
155 Education an action by a school or school district which the
156 individual alleges to be in violation of this section.
157 (b) The state board shall grant a hearing on an appeal
158 under this subsection within 45 days after receiving the appeal.
159 (11) A school or school district does not violate
160 subsection (8) if a contractor or other employee of the school
161 or school district incidentally views a video recording made
162 under this section in connection with the performance of his or
163 her duties related to either of the following:
164 (a) The installation, operation, or maintenance of video
165 equipment; or
166 (b) The retention of video recordings.
167 (12) This section does not:
168 (a) Limit the access of the parent of a student, under the
169 Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA), 20 U.S.C. s.
170 1232g, or any other law, to a video recording regarding his or
171 her student.
172 (b) Waive any immunity from liability of a school district
173 or an employee of a school district.
174 (c) Create any liability for a cause of action against a
175 school or school district or an employee of a school or school
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb859-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 859 2026
176 district carrying out the duties and responsibilities required
177 by this section.
178 (d) Apply to self-contained classrooms in which the only
179 students receiving special education services are those who have
180 been deemed gifted.
181 (13) The department shall collect information relating to
182 the installation and maintenance of video cameras under this
183 section.
184 (14) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to
185 implement this section.
186 Section 2. For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of $2
187 million in nonrecurring funds is appropriated from the General
188 Revenue Fund to the Department of Education for school districts
189 providing video cameras in self-contained classrooms pursuant to
190 s. 1003.574, Florida Statutes.
191 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb859-00